District of Columbia statutes.
29-703.05

Limited duties of limited partners.

(a)

A limited partner shall not have any fiduciary duty to the limited partnership or to any other partner solely by reason of being a limited partner.

(b)

A limited partner shall discharge the duties to the partnership and the other partners under this chapter or under the partnership agreement and exercise any rights consistently with the obligation of good faith and fair dealing.

(c)

A limited partner does not violate a duty or obligation under this chapter or under the partnership agreement merely because the limited partner’s conduct furthers the limited partner’s own interest.

(d)

If a limited partner enters into a transaction with a limited partnership, the limited partner’s rights and obligations arising from the transaction are the same as those of a person that is not a partner.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(4)(E), 59 DCR 13171

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-701.07, § 29-706.01, and § 29-706.02.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “does” for “shall” in (c); and added (d).

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 305 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.